Hawaii statutes.
[§141-2.6] Fees for aquaculture services.
The department of agriculture may establish and assess fees pursuant to chapter
91 for:

(1) Aquatic animal and plant health diagnostic
services; and

(2) Any items or expert services purchased from the
department related to aquaculture planning, disease management, and the
marketing of seafood products;

provided that the assessment of these fees does not
violate any other provision of this chapter. [L 2000, c 193, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next